Utah statutes.
40-10-19.   Information provided by permittees to division -- Inspections by
division -- Signs required at operations entrances -- Violations reported by
reclamation officers -- Copies of records and reports available to public.
(1)  For the purpose of developing, administering, and enforcing any permit
under this chapter, or of determining whether any person is in violation of
any requirement of this chapter, the division shall require any permittee to
provide information relative to surface coal mining and reclamation operations
as the division deems reasonable and necessary in the division's rules.
(2)  The authorized representatives of the division, without advance notice
and upon presentation of appropriate credentials:
(a)  shall have the right of entry into, upon, or through any surface coal
mining and reclamation operations or any premises in which any records
required to be maintained under Subsection (2) are located; and
(b)  may at reasonable times, and without delay, have access to and copy any
records, inspect any monitoring equipment or method of operation required
under this chapter.  As required by Subsection 40-8-17(2), this entry and
access are conditions to obtaining an approved state permit to conduct surface
mining operations.
(3)  The inspections by the division shall:
(a)  occur on an irregular basis averaging not less than one partial
inspection per month and one complete inspection per calendar quarter for the
surface coal mining and reclamation operation covered by each permit;
(b)  occur without prior notice to the permittee or his agents or employees
except for necessary onsite meetings with the permittee; and
(c)  include the filing of inspection reports adequate to enforce the
requirements of and to carry out the terms and purposes of this chapter.
(4)  Each permittee shall conspicuously maintain at the entrances to the
surface coal mining and reclamation operations a clearly visible sign which
sets forth the names, business address, and phone number of the permittee and
the permit number of the surface coal mining and reclamation operations.
(5)  Each reclamation officer, upon detection of each violation of any
requirement of this chapter, shall forthwith inform the operator in writing
and shall report in writing the violation to the division.
(6)  Copies of any records, reports, inspection materials, or information
obtained under this chapter by the division shall be made immediately
available to the public.
